Hawaii statutes.
§516-141 Purchase of existing loans
program. (a) The corporation may contract with a mortgage lender to
purchase, in whole or in part, existing loans, whether or not eligible loans.
The contract may contain provisions as determined by the corporation to be
necessary or appropriate to provide security for its revenue bonds, including
but not limited to provisions requiring the:

(1) Repurchase of the loans, in whole or in part, by
mortgage lenders at the option of the corporation;

(2) Payments of premiums, fees, charges, or other
amounts by mortgage lenders to provide a reserve or escrow fund for the
purposes of protecting against loan defaults; and

(3) Guarantee by, or for recourse against, mortgage
lenders, with respect to defaults on these loans of the corporation.

(b) The corporation shall require as a
condition of each purchase of existing loans from a mortgage lender that the
mortgage lender proceed to make and disburse eligible loans in an aggregate
principal amount substantially equal to the amount of the proceeds from the
purchase by the corporation of loans therefrom. [L 1983, c 270, pt of §1; am L
1987, c 337, §16; am L 1988, c 104, §2; am L 2005, c 196, §26(b); am L 2006, c
180, §16]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next